Hawaii statutes.
[§11-356] Contributions by foreign
national or foreign corporation prohibited. (a) Except as provided in
subsection (b), no contributions or expenditures shall be made to or on behalf
of a candidate, candidate committee, or noncandidate committee, by a foreign
national or foreign corporation, including a domestic subsidiary of a foreign
corporation, a domestic corporation that is owned by a foreign national, or a
local subsidiary where administrative control is retained by the foreign
corporation, and in the same manner prohibited under 2 United States Code
section 441e and 11 Code of Federal Regulations section 110.20, as amended.

(b) A foreign-owned domestic corporation may
make contributions if:

(1) Foreign national individuals do not participate in
election-related activities, including decisions concerning contributions or
the administration of a candidate committee or noncandidate committee; or

(2) The contributions are domestically-derived. [L
2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next